Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.390

Appropriations for special education programs.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5263-S2.SL) ***

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year a programmed budget request for special education programs for students with disabilities. Funding for programs operated by local school districts shall be on an excess cost basis from appropriations provided by the legislature for special education programs for students with disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing through RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and 28A.150.415.

(2) The excess cost allocation to school districts shall be based on the following:

(a) A district's annual average head count enrollment of students ages three and four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten who are eligible for and receiving special education, multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by 1.2;

(b)(i) Subject to the limitation in (b)(ii) of this subsection (2), a district's annual average enrollment of resident students who are eligible for and receiving special education, excluding students ages three and four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten, multiplied by the district's base allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied by the special education cost multiplier rate of:

(A) Beginning in the 2020-21 school year, either:

(I) 1.0075 for students eligible for and receiving special education and reported to be in the general education setting for 80 percent or more of the school day; or

(II) 0.995 for students eligible for and receiving special education and reported to be in the general education setting for less than 80 percent of the school day;

(B) Beginning in the 2023-24 school year, either:

(I) 1.12 for students eligible for and receiving special education and reported to be in the general education setting for 80 percent or more of the school day; or

(II) 1.06 for students eligible for and receiving special education and reported to be in the general education setting for less than 80 percent of the school day.

(ii) If the enrollment percent exceeds 16 percent, the excess cost allocation calculated under (b)(i) of this subsection must be adjusted by multiplying the allocation by 16 percent divided by the enrollment percent.

(3) As used in this section:

(a) "Base allocation" means the total state allocation to all schools in the district generated by the distribution formula under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(a), (5), (6), and (8) and the allocation under RCW 28A.150.415, to be divided by the district's full-time equivalent enrollment.

(b) "Basic education enrollment" means enrollment of resident students including nonresident students enrolled under RCW 28A.225.225 and students from nonhigh districts enrolled under RCW 28A.225.210 and excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an interdistrict cooperative program under RCW 28A.225.250.

(c) "Enrollment percent" means the district's resident annual average enrollment of students who are eligible for and receiving special education, excluding students ages three and four and those five year olds not yet enrolled in kindergarten and students enrolled in institutional education programs, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

[ 2024 c 229 s 1; 2023 c 417 s 3; 2020 c 90 s 3; 2019 c 387 s 4; 2018 c 266 s 102; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 406; 2010 c 236 s 3; 2009 c 548 s 108; 1995 c 77 s 6; 1994 c 180 s 8; 1993 c 149 s 9; 1990 c 33 s 116; 1989 c 400 s 2; 1980 c 87 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.41.053.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 90: See note following RCW 43.216.580.

Intent—Findings—2019 c 387: See note following RCW 28A.150.392.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—2010 c 236 ss 2, 3, 4, 8, 10, 13, and 14: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Conflict with federal requirements—1994 c 180: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 1994 c 180 s 10.]

Severability—1994 c 180: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1994 c 180 s 11.]

Conflict with federal requirements—1993 c 149: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 1993 c 149 s 12.]

Severability—1993 c 149: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1993 c 149 s 13.]

Effective dates—1993 c 149: "(1) Sections 1 through 10 and 12 through 14 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 30, 1993].

(2) Section 11 of this act takes effect September 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 149 s 15.]

Intent—1989 c 400: "The legislature finds that there is increasing demand for school districts' special education programs to include medical services necessary for handicapped children's participation and educational progress. In some cases, these services could qualify for federal funding under Title XIX of the social security act. The legislature intends to establish a process for school districts to obtain reimbursement for eligible services from medical assistance funds. In this way, state dollars for handicapped education can be leveraged to generate federal matching funds, thereby increasing the overall level of resources available for school districts' special education programs." [ 1989 c 400 s 1.]

Severability—Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: See notes following RCW 28A.155.010.